Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.676

[Art. 89] Disrespect towards superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who behaves with disrespect towards his or her superior commissioned officer shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 2011 c 336 s 779; 1963 c 220 s 88.]